test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-sunsungkwe_gt-norm.yaml
#Past participle
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc: сунсум
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg1: сусмум
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg2: сусмын
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg3: сусме
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu1: сусмаме̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu2: [сусмын, сусмы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu3: сусмыг
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl1: [сусмув, сусӯв]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl2: [сусмын, сусмы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl3: сусмыт

#Past participle, single object
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg1: сусмылум
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg2: сусмылын
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg3: сусмытэ
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu1: сусмыламе̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu2: сусмылы̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu3: сусмытэ̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl1: [сусмылув, сусмылӯв]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl2: сусмылы̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl3: сусманыл

#Past participle, dual object
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg1: сусмагум
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg2: сусмагын
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg3: сусмаге
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu1: [сусмагаме̄н, сусмагагме̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu2: [сусмагы̄н, сусмагагы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu3: [сусмагы̄г, сусмагагы̄г]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl1: [сусмагув, сусмвгӯв]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl2: [сусмагы̄н, сусмагагы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl3: [сусмагагыл, сусмагаганыл]

#Past participle, plural object
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg1: [сусманум, сусмананум]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg2: [сусман, сусма̄нын]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg3: [сусма̄нэ, сусмана̄нэ]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu1: [сусманаме̄н, сусмананме̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu2: [сусманн, сусманы̄н, сусмананы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu3: [сусманэ̄н, сусмананэ̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl1: [сусманув, сусманӯв, сусмананув, сусмананӯв]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl2: [сусманы̄н, сусмананы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl3: [сусма̄ныл, сусмана̄ныл]

#Gerund
    сунсуӈкве+V+Ger: сунсым
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: сунсымам
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: сунсыман
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: сунсыма
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: сунсымаме̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: сунсыман
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: суснсымаг
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: сунсымав
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: сунсыман
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: сунсымат

#Privative
    сунсуӈкве+V+Ger: сустал
